California, session 20252026, AB1493.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5091 of the Education Code is amended to read:5091. (a) (1) If a vacancy occurs, or if a resignation has been filed with the county superintendent of schools containing a deferred effective date, the school district or community college district governing board shall, within 60 days of the vacancy or the filing of the deferred resignation, either order an election or make a provisional appointment to fill the vacancy. A governing board member may not defer the effective date of the member’s resignation for more than 60 days after the member files the resignation with the county superintendent of schools.(2) In the event that a If a governing board fails to make a provisional appointment or order an election within the prescribed 60-day period as required by this section, the county superintendent of schools shall order an election to fill the vacancy.(b) When If an election is ordered, it shall be held on the next established election date provided pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1000) of Division 1 of the Elections Code not less fewer than 130 days after the order of the election.(c) (1) If a provisional appointment is made within the 60-day period, the registered voters of the district may, within 30 days from the date of the appointment, petition for the conduct of a special election to fill the vacancy. A petition shall be deemed to bear a sufficient number of signatures if signed by at least the number of registered voters of the district equal to 11/2 percent of the number of registered voters of the district at the time of the last regular election for governing board members, or 25 registered voters, whichever is greater. However, in districts with less fewer than 2,000 registered voters, a petition shall be deemed to bear a sufficient number of signatures if signed by at least 5 percent of the number of registered voters of the district at the time of the last regular election for governing board members.(2)(A)The(2) The petition shall be submitted to the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction who shall have 30 days to verify the signatures. If the petition is determined to be legally sufficient by the county superintendent of schools, the provisional appointment is terminated, and the county superintendent of schools shall order a special election to be conducted consolidated with the next regularly scheduled election if that election is scheduled not less fewer than 88, nor more than 125, 88 days following the order of the election. The provisional appointee may remain in office until the special election result is certified.(B)Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the election may be conducted within 180 days after the issuance of the order so that the election may be consolidated with a regularly scheduled election.(3) For purposes of this section, “registered voters” means the following:(A) If the district uses the at-large method of election, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 14026 of the Elections Code, registered voters of the entire school district or community college district.(B) If the district uses district-based elections, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 14026 of the Elections Code, registered voters of the election district.(d) A provisional appointment made pursuant to subdivision (a) confers all powers and duties of a governing board member upon the appointee immediately following that appointment.(e) A Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a person appointed to fill a vacancy shall hold office only until the next regularly scheduled election for district governing board members that is scheduled 130 or more days after the effective date of the vacancy, whereupon an election shall be held to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term. A person elected at an election to fill the vacancy shall hold office for the remainder of the term in which the vacancy occurs or will occur.(f) (1) If a petition calling for a special election is circulated, the petition shall meet all of the following requirements:(A) The petition shall contain the election official’s estimate of the cost of conducting the special election and those estimated costs expressed on a per-pupil or per-student basis.(B) The name and residence address of at least one, but not more than five, of the proponents of the petition shall appear on the petition, each of which proponents shall be a registered voter of the school district or community college district, as applicable.(C) None of the text or other language of the petition shall appear in less than six-point type.(D) The petition shall be prepared and circulated in conformity with Sections 100 and 104 of the Elections Code.(2) If any of the requirements of this subdivision are not met as to any petition calling for a special election, the county superintendent of schools shall not verify the signatures, nor shall any further action be taken with respect to the petition.(3) No person shall permit the list of names on petitions prescribed by this section to be used for any purpose other than qualification of the petition for the purpose of holding an election pursuant to this section.(4) The petition filed with the county superintendent of schools shall be subject to the restrictions in Article 2 (commencing with Section 7924.100) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.(g) Elections held pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be conducted in as nearly the same manner as practicable as other governing board member elections.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 47607.2 of the Education Code, as amended by Section 57 of Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021, is amended to read:47607.2.(a)(1)The chartering authority shall not renew a charter if either of the following apply for two consecutive years immediately preceding the renewal decision:(A)The charter school has received the two lowest performance levels schoolwide on all the state indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5 for which it receives performance levels.(B)For all measurements of academic performance, the charter school has received performance levels schoolwide that are the same or lower than the state average and, for a majority of subgroups performing statewide below the state average in each respective year, received performance levels that are lower than the state average.(2)A charter school that meets the criteria established by this subdivision and paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 47607 shall only qualify for treatment under this subdivision.(3)The chartering authority shall consider the following factors, and may renew a charter that meets the criteria in paragraph (1) only upon making both of the following written factual findings, specific to the particular petition, setting forth specific facts to support the findings:(A)The charter school is taking meaningful steps to address the underlying cause or causes of low performance, and those steps are reflected, or will be reflected, in a written plan adopted by the governing body of the charter school.(B)There is clear and convincing evidence showing either of the following:(i)The school achieved measurable increases in academic achievement, as defined by at least one year’s progress for each year in school.(ii)Strong postsecondary outcomes, as defined by college enrollment, persistence, and completion rates equal to similar peers.(C)Clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (B) shall be demonstrated by verified data, as defined in subdivision (c).(4)Verified data, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be considered by the chartering authority until the state board adopted student-level growth model for English language arts and mathematics is fully implemented as to provide the two years of data necessary for purposes of charter school renewal.(5)For a charter renewed pursuant to this subdivision, the chartering authority may grant a renewal for a period of two years.(b)(1)For all charter schools for which paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 47607 and subdivision (a) of this section do not apply, the chartering authority shall consider the schoolwide performance and performance of all subgroups of pupils served by the charter school on the state indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5 and the performance of the charter school on the local indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5.(2)The chartering authority shall provide greater weight to performance on measurements of academic performance in determining whether to grant a charter renewal.(3)In addition to the state and local indicators, the chartering authority shall consider clear and convincing evidence showing either of the following:(A)The school achieved measurable increases in academic achievement, as defined by at least one year’s progress for each year in school.(B)Strong postsecondary outcomes, as defined by college enrollment, persistence, and completion rates equal to similar peers.(4)Subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (3) shall be demonstrated by verified data, as defined in subdivision (c).(5)The chartering authority may deny a charter renewal pursuant to this subdivision only upon making written findings, setting forth specific facts to support the findings, that the charter school has failed to meet or make sufficient progress toward meeting standards that provide a benefit to the pupils of the school, that closure of the charter school is in the best interest of pupils and, if applicable pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3), that its decision provided greater weight to performance on measurements of academic performance.(6)Verified data, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be considered by the chartering authority until the state board adopted student-level growth model for English language arts and mathematics is fully implemented as to provide the two years of data necessary for purposes of charter school renewal.(7)For a charter renewed pursuant to this subdivision, the chartering authority shall grant a renewal for a period of five years.(c)(1)For purposes of this section, “verified data” means data derived from nationally recognized, valid, peer-reviewed, and reliable sources that are included on the approved list of assessments adopted and maintained by the state board. Verified data shall include measures of postsecondary outcomes.(2)Revisions to the approved list of assessments maintained by the state board shall not be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(3)The state board may adopt and make necessary revisions to the approved list of assessments maintained by the state board in accordance with the requirements of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).SEC. 2.Section 47607.2 of the Education Code, as added by Section 9 of Chapter 486 of the Statutes of 2019, is repealed.SEC. 3.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.